Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 25. Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Competition Team Grant Program And Fund.

[Expired]

§§ 22.1-362,
22.1-363.

Expired July 1, 2018.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 22.1-362 and 22.1-363, relating to STEM Competition Team Grant Program and Fund, were enacted by Acts 2016, c. 761 and expired July 1, 2018, pursuant to Acts 2016, c. 761, cl. 2.